Hawaii statutes.
[§453D-4] Fees; disposition. (a)
Application, examination, reexamination, license, renewal, restoration,
penalty, and any other fees relating to the administration of this chapter,
shall not be refundable and shall be provided in rules adopted by the director
pursuant to chapter 91.

(b) Fees assessed shall defray costs incurred
by the department to support the operation of the mental health [counselors]
licensing program. Fees collected shall be managed in accordance with section
26-9(l). [L 2004, c 209, pt of §2; am L 2008, c 206, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next